Florida, session 2026, SB428.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âSubsection (1) and paragraph (b) of subsection 23 (2) of section 514.073, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 24 514.073âSwimming Lesson Voucher Program.â 25 (1)âThere is created within the department the Swimming 26 Lesson Voucher Program. The purpose of the program is to 27 increase water safety and prevent drownings in this state by 28 offering vouchers for swimming lessons at no cost to families 29 with an income of no more than 200 percent of the federal 30 poverty level who have one or more children between 1 and 7 4 31 years of age or younger. 32 (2)âThe department shall do all of the following to 33 implement the program: 34 (b)âEstablish a method for members of the public to apply 35 for swimming lesson vouchers and for determining an applicantâs 36 eligibility. The department shall establish eligibility criteria 37 necessary for a family to receive one or more vouchers from the 38 program, including, but not limited to, the following: 39 1.âThe age of each child for whom a voucher is being 40 sought, who must be between 1 and 7 may be no more than 4 years 41 of age. 42 2.âThe family income level, which may be up to 200 percent 43 of the federal poverty level. 44 3.âThe familyâs address of residency in this state. 45 Section 2.âSection 383.3363, Florida Statutes, is created 46 to read: 47 383.3363âEducation on drowning prevention safety measures 48 and safe bathing practices.â 49 (1)âThe Department of Health shall develop educational 50 materials on drowning prevention safety measures and safe 51 bathing practices to be distributed to parents or caregivers as 52 part of postpartum or childbirth education provided by 53 hospitals, birth centers, home birth providers, and childbirth 54 educators in this state. The materials must include, but need 55 not be limited to, instruction on all of the following: 56 (a)âThe increased risk of drowning for infants and toddlers 57 in bathtubs, pools, and other water sources, citing available 58 data on such drownings. 59 (b)âWater safety measures parents can employ to prevent 60 drowning, emphasizing the importance of constant supervision of 61 infants and children while they are around water and the 62 benefits of early childhood swimming lessons and water 63 competency programs as an added layer of protection from 64 drowning. 65 (c)âAdditional safety hazards in the home setting and 66 evidence-based safe bathing practices. 67 (2)âHospitals, birth centers, and home birth providers 68 providing maternity, prenatal, and newborn services shall 69 provide the educational materials developed under subsection (1) 70 to the parents or caregivers of a newborn as part of their 71 postpartum education and care. 72 (3)âChildbirth educators shall provide the educational 73 materials developed under subsection (1) to the parents or 74 caregivers receiving childbirth education. 75 Section 3.âParagraph (j) is added to subsection (4) of 76 section 383.318, Florida Statutes, to read: 77 383.318âPostpartum care for birth center clients and 78 infants.â 79 (4)âThe birth center shall provide a postpartum evaluation 80 and follow-up followup care that includes all of the following: 81 (j)âProvision of the educational materials on drowning 82 prevention safety measures and safe bathing practices developed 83 by the Department of Health under s. 383.3363. 84 Section 4.âSection 395.1053, Florida Statutes, is amended 85 to read: 86 395.1053âPostpartum education.âA hospital that provides 87 birthing services shall provide each parent with postpartum 88 education on the care of newborns, which must include all of the 89 following: 90 (1)âincorporate Information on safe sleep practices and the 91 possible causes of Sudden Unexpected Infant Death. into the 92 hospitalâs postpartum instruction on the care of newborns and 93 provide to each parent 94 (2)âThe informational pamphlet on infant and childhood eye 95 and vision disorders created by the department pursuant to s. 96 383.14(3)(h). 97 (3)âThe educational materials on drowning prevention safety 98 measures and safe bathing practices developed by the department 99 under s. 383.3363. 100 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.